Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 6 Pleadings

9-6-1, 9-6-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 292; G.L. 1909, ch. 288, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 338, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 517, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

9-6-1

, 9-6-2; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 15, effective January 10, 1966. For form of complaint on account in superior court see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rules, Form 4. For form of complaint in district court, see Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rules, Form 3-A.

9-6-3.
Formal defects to be disregarded.

No summons, writ, complaint, return, process, judgment, or other proceeding in civil causes in any court shall be abated, arrested, quashed, or reversed for any defect or want of form, but the court shall proceed and give judgment according as the right of the cause and matter in law shall appear unto it, without regarding any imperfections, defects, or want of form in the writ, pleading, return, process, judgment, or proceeding whatsoever.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 260; G.L. 1909, ch. 285, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 335, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 519, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-6-3

.

9-6-4 — 9-6-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 285, 287, 301, 302; G.L. 1909, ch. 288, §§ 1, 3, 18, 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 338, §§ 1, 3, 18, 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 520, §§ 1, 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 522, §§ 1, 2; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 15, effective January 10, 1966. After such date demurrers are not to be used, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 7(c) and District Court Civil Rule 7(d). For method of making objections in superior court, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 12. For method of making objections in district court, see District Court Civil Rule 12.

9-6-9.
Truth as defense to libel or slander.

In every action or proceeding, civil or criminal, for libel or slander, the defendant may, with his or her plea of not guilty or his answer, file a written notice that he or she will prove the truth of the publication charged as libelous, or of the words charged as slanderous, and in such case may, upon the trial, give the truth in evidence, without any special plea of justification or affirmative defense in his or her answer; and the truth, unless published or uttered from malicious motives, shall be sufficient defense to the person charged.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 286; G.L. 1909, ch. 288, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 338, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 520, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-6-9

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 16.

9-6-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 288; G.L. 1909, ch. 288, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 338, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 520, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-6-10

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 15, effective January 10, 1966. For practice after such date in pleading payment or other affirmative defenses in the superior and district courts, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 8(c) and Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 8(c).

9-6-11.
Substantial performance as defense to action on bond.

Whenever any action shall be brought upon any bond which has a condition of defeasance to make void the bond upon the payment of a less sum at a day or place certain, if the obligor, his or her heirs, executors, or administrators have, before the action brought, paid to the obligee, his or her heirs, executors, or administrators the principal and interest due by the defeasance or condition of the bond, although the payment was not made strictly according to the condition or defeasance, yet it may, nevertheless, be pleaded in defense of the action, and shall be as effectual a bar thereof as if the money had been paid at the day and place, according to the condition or defeasance, and had been so pleaded.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 289; G.L. 1909, ch. 288, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 338, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 520, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-6-11

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 16.

9-6-12, 9-6-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 290, 291; G.L. 1909, ch. 288, §§ 6, 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 338, §§ 6, 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 520, §§ 6, 7; G.L. 1956, §§

9-6-12

, 9-6-13; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 15, effective January 10, 1966. For procedure for offer of judgment, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 68 and Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 68.

9-6-14.
Tender unimpaired by demand for receipt.

The requirement or demand of a receipt for the amount of lawful money as may be offered or tendered shall not prevent the offer or tender from being regarded or held to be a legal tender.

History of Section.

P.L. 1904, ch. 1151, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 288, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 338, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 520, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-6-14

.

9-6-15.
Pleading of equitable defense in district courts.

In any action at law, pending in a district court, the plaintiff or the defendant may plead any equitable defense, upon which an unconditional judgment can be rendered for the party pleading the defense.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 242; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 520, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

9-6-15

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 16.

9-6-16 — 9-6-23.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 293-300; G.L. 1909, ch. 288, §§ 10-17; G.L. 1923, ch. 338, §§ 10-17; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 521, §§ 1-8; G.L. 1956, §§

9-6-16

to 9-6-23; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 15, effective January 10, 1966. For procedure for counterclaim, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 13 and Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 13.